kam.dix
    <pardef n="dem">
      <e><p> <l>ũyũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>aya</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ũyũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩnũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>yĩĩ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>aya</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kĩĩ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ii</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩno</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kaa</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>tũũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>vaa</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kũũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>aa</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ii</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ithi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ũũ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="prox"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ũsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>asu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ũsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>yĩu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>asu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kĩu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>isu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kau</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>tũu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>vau</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kũu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>asu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ĩsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>isu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ũsu</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dist"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/>dem</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poss__w/m">
      <e><p> <l>w</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>m</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>w</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>y</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>y</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>m</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ky</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>sy</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>y</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>k</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>tw</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>v</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kw</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>m</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>y</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>sy</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>w</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/>w</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poss__wi/mai">
      <e><p> <l>wi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mai</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c1c2"/><s n="pl"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>wi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>yi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c3c4"/><s n="pl"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>yi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mai</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c5c6"/><s n="pl"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kaĩ</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e> <!-- irregular -->
      <e><p> <l>si</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c7c8"/><s n="pl"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>si</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c9"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>ki</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>twi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="c11c12"/><s n="pl"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>vai</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cA"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>kwi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cB"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>mai</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cC"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>yi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cD"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>si</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cE"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
      <e><p> <l>wi</l> <r><s n="prn"/><s n="poss"/><s n="cF"/><s n="sg"/>wi</r> </p></e>
    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e lm="dem"><par n="dem"/><i></i></e>
    <e lm="wakwa"><par n="poss__w/m"/><i>akwa</i></e>
    <e lm="witũ"><par n="poss__wi/mai"/><i>tũ</i></e>
    <e lm="waku"><par n="poss__w/m"/><i>aku</i></e>
    <e lm="wenyu"><par n="poss__w/m"/><i>enyu</i></e>
    <e lm="wake"><par n="poss__w/m"/><i>ake</i></e>
    <e lm="woo"><par n="poss__w/m"/><i>oo</i></e>
